Oklahoma, session 2026, SB810.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 8016 of Title 62, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Zero-Based


Budgeting Implementation Act”.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 8017 of Title 62, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. No later than December 1, 2025, the Legislative Office of


Fiscal Transparency (LOFT) shall develop a list of every Oklahoma

Req. No. 1413 Page 1


State Agency. As used in this Act, “Agency” and “State Agency”


shall have the same meaning as the term pursuant to Section 415.12


of Title 74 of the Oklahoma Statues to include every Agency, Board,


Commission, Trust, and entity of government of the State of Oklahoma


that receives any appropriated funds, or is designated as a non-


appropriated entity yet operates as a State Agency, Board,


Commission, Trust, or other entity of State Government.


B. No later than December 1, 2025, LOFT shall use the full list


of Agencies developed under Subsection A of this section to develop


a tiered categorization structure for all agencies to implement a


staggered plan for agency review using zero-based budgeting.


C. The tiered categorization shall consist of a minimum of


three tiers in which to classify each agency. LOFT shall separate


the agencies into tiered categories with the higher tiers for


agencies with larger budgets, more employees, a greater statutory


footprint, more licenses, and more administrative rules.


The Tiered categorization for each state agency shall be created


by taking into consideration the following:


1. The size of the current annual budget of the agency from all


revenue sources including state appropriations, federal funds,


grants, gifts, etc;


2. The number of employees currently authorized as well as


currently filled positions by the agency;


3. The number of statutes covering the state agency operations;

Req. No. 1413 Page 2


4. The number of administrative rules promulgated by the state


agency;


5. The number of licensees overseen by the state agency; and


6. Any other relevant information as identified by LOFT.


D. LOFT shall develop a staggered plan based on the tiered


categorization structure created subsection C of this section.


1. Higher tiered agencies shall be up for review no fewer than


every 4 and no more than every 6 years. Lower tiered agencies shall


be up for review no fewer than every 2 or no more than every 4 years


on a standard system.


2. The staggered plan shall be created so that all agencies


will rotate being up for review over a maximum six year period from


first implementation.


3. The staggered plan shall take into consideration the


currently scheduled sunset of any agency so that the agency is


reviewed using zero-based budgeting the year before it is up for


sunset extension.


4. The staggered plan shall include a cross section of agencies


from each tier so that each year will have as similar of a


distribution as possible of the items listed under paragraph B so


that no one year has an exceedingly higher cumulative amount of


budget, statutes, rules, employees, or other items to be reviewed


when all agencies up for review that year than any other year on the


staggered plan.

Req. No. 1413 Page 3


5. The staggered plan will be based on the fiscal year. Each


July 1st LOFT will begin evaluating each agency up for review that


year in order to complete the review and issue a report by December


1st of that year for Legislative consideration during the next


session.


SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 8018 of Title 62, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. Beginning July 1, 2026, LOFT shall use the staggered plan


created in Section 2 of this Act to begin zero-based budgeting


reviews of the agencies identified to be included in the staggered


plan during the 2027 fiscal year and shall provide the Legislature


with zero-based budgeting recommendations by December 1st each year.


B. The LOFT zero-based budgeting review and analysis shall be a


collaborative process between LOFT, an agency, the Governor’s


office, the Legislature, and agency program staff. LOFT analysts


will meet with the agency staff as needed to review and obtain any


relevant information to perform a thorough analysis.


C. The zero-based budgeting analysis process consists of four


main steps:


1. Identify and Evaluate Key Activities


LOFT analysts will initiate the process by gathering information


from the agency and compiling their research on the programs and the


key activities of the agency. In collaboration with the agency,

Req. No. 1413 Page 4


LOFT analysts will work to ensure an adequate understanding of the


program and its activities. Agencies shall discuss the program’s key


activities and explain why the program and its activities are


critical and necessary. Agencies shall provide information on the


programs intended outcomes, statutory authority, customers, budget,


and consider alternative methods for delivering program services.


2. Information to be considered when evaluating the key


activities and related information include but are not limited to:


a. Key Activities:


(1) Who is the primary constituency for the activity?


(2) Is the activity concentrated in one particular


part of the state, or is it implemented


consistently statewide?


(3) Is there any historical context for the activity


that is important for decision makers to know?


(4) What is the policy objective for the activity and


program?


(5) What are some alternative ways of delivering the


services of the program?


(6) What are the trade-offs of the alternative


methods?


(7) How do the key activities relate to the


appropriated purpose of the program?


b. Statutory Authority:

Req. No. 1413 Page 5


(1) Is the agency statutorily required to perform the


activity?


(2) Is the statutory authority specific to that


activity or is the activity being performed


within the broader general powers and authority


of the Agency?


(3) What are the legal consequences to not performing


the activity? Include any state, federal, or


rule/regulation authority or requirements.


c. Personnel:


(1) Are personnel wholly or partially dedicated to


this activity?


(2) If partially, what percentage of the time is the


employee working on this activity?


d. Expenditures:


(1) What is the current budget/cost to carry out the


activity?


(2) What are the major cost centers for the activity?


(3) What are the overhead costs to operating the


program?


e. Administrative rules:


(1) What percentage of new administration rules have


been enacted over the last 5 years by this


agency?

Req. No. 1413 Page 6


(2) Amendatory rules?


(3) Repealed rules?


f. Licensing:


(1) What is the burden on licensing of individuals


under this state agency?


(2) Is the licensing only for government employees or


private sector employees?


D. Develop and Evaluate the Performance Measures


1. After the key activities have been identified under


subsection A of the Section, LOFT shall identify the appropriate


performance measures for the program and its activities. As part of


the zero-based budgeting analysis process LOFT shall conduct a


thorough review of the measures and work with the Governor’s office


and the Legislature on recommendations in a coordinated manner. The


coordinated review is intended to develop a common understanding of


the program’s purpose and ensure that the measures reported satisfy


the expectations of core functions of government in Oklahoma.


Agencies will review the recommendations and offer alternative


metrics if appropriate. At the end of the process, the zero-based


budgeting report should reflect the best possible measures for the


programs and activities of an agency and provide state and agency


leadership the information needed to assess program performance and


improve operations in a report provided to the Governor and the



Req. No. 1413 Page 7


Legislature no later than December 1st each year. The zero-based


budgeting process should include:


a. review of existing and historical performance measures


for the program,


b. development and evaluation of performance measures for


the program,


c. internal review by LOFT of zero-based budget


performance measures,


d. discussion of performance measures with the agency,


and


e. review of agency budget performance measures by The


Oklahoma Senate, The Oklahoma House of


Representatives, the Director of the Office of


Management and Enterprise Services, and LOFT with the


agency.


2. Performance measures are an integral part of a zero-based


budgeting analysis and should describe the workload, efficiency, and


effectiveness of the activity or program.


Performance Measures will include at least four years of actual


data and the agency should be able to explain trends over time in


outcomes as well as how those outcomes reflect a program’s overall


effectiveness. Where historical data is available, analysts will


review performance trends and consider factors contributing to


program performance. When the zero-based budgeting process results

Req. No. 1413 Page 8


in a new performance measure that the agency does not currently


track, analysts will work with the agency to develop a plan for


tracking the performance measure in all future fiscal years.


3. While the zero-based budgeting process focuses on


performance at the program level, the agency and state performance


metrics to which the program contributes should also be considered.


When selecting candidate measures, relevant state indicators and


federal benchmarks should be identified and included with the other


ZBB performance measures.


Performance measures should be selected based on overall value


for providing meaningful information to management and decision


makers. Quality performance measures are clear (understandable to


general audience), valid (data can be measured), and relevant to the


core purpose of the program or agency. LOFT shall use the questions


for analysis/consideration, including but not limited to:


a. Based on the performance measures identified, how are


the program and its activities performing?


b. What factors may be causing a program to be less


effective than desired and what would need to change


to increase effectiveness? This could include law


changes, funding changes, etc.


c. Is the data provided for the performance measure


reliable and accurate? Is the agency able to document


the sources used for the data?

Req. No. 1413 Page 9


d. What are the limitations of the data available for the


measures, if any?


E. Analyze the Program Budget and Expenditures


1. The financial analysis of a program will examine historical


expenditures by object class for a program. The goal of the


analysis is to show the cost effectiveness or return on investment


of the program when compared to the outcomes established in the


performance metric analysis. Agencies shall explain in detail the


expenditures that comprise each object class and identify the major


cost centers for each program. LOFT shall use the following


questions for analysis/consideration, including but not limited to:


a. Personal Services:


(1) What percentage of program expenditures is


dedicated to personnel?


(2) Are personnel expenditures primarily for full-


time staff or for temporary/part-time staff?


(3) Could more functions of the program be performed


by part-time rather than full-time staff? Why?


(4) Does the agency use contractors to fulfill


activities that could be done with staff or the


converse?


(5) How have budget reductions over the last few


years affected personnel as compared to basic



Req. No. 1413 Page 10


operations such as travel, equipment, contractual


services, etc. in the program?


b. Regular Operating Expenses/Motor Vehicle Expenses and


Repairs:


(1) Is the agency spending an increasing and/or


substantial amount on motor vehicle expenses and


repairs?


(2) If so, be able to show the size and age of fleet,


average operating cost per vehicle, anticipated


mileage for the upcoming year, etc. Would


vehicle expenses be reduced by replacing part of


the fleet rather than continuing to repair older


vehicles?


c. Publications and Printing:


(1) Are there publications that could be reduced or


eliminated by making them available


electronically to consumers?


(2) Could forms be consolidated to reduce the number


or types of forms that the agency prints?


d. Supplies and Materials:


(1) Are there unusual items that this program


requires or are there cyclical buying cycles for


supplies?



Req. No. 1413 Page 11


(2) How has supply expenditures changed over the last


two years?


e. Repairs and Maintenance:


(1) Are there major repairs funded through this


object class that could be funded through bonds


rather than cash?


(2) Does the agency perform repairs and maintenance


in house or are these functions contracted out?


(3) Could savings be achieved by outsourcing (or


insourcing) these items?


f. Equipment:


(1) Is this a large cost center for the program? What


is the age of inventory?


(2) Is an inordinate amount spent to repair older


equipment?


(3) Would it be more cost effective to repair


existing equipment or purchase new?


g. Energy: Has the agency found ways to reduce utility


costs to offset increases in rates?


h. Travel:


(1) Have travel expenditures varied significantly


between years?


(2) How do travel expenditures correspond with motor


vehicle expenses? Are employees who travel

Req. No. 1413 Page 12


primarily relying on their vehicles or state


vehicles?


i. Real Estate Rentals:


(1) You should have a thorough inventory of real


estate space including the square footage, price


per square foot, geographic locations, and


details of the rental agreement.


(2) Are there penalties to relocating certain offices


or consolidating office space with other


divisions or departments?


j. Telecommunications:


(1) Does the agency have a staff member who reviews


billings from the agency’s telecommunications


provider each month?


(2) Has the agency thoroughly evaluated the inventory


for which it is billed to determine if there are


terminals/phone lines that are unused that should


be disconnected?


(3) Has the agency worked with the contracted


telecommunication providers to find ways to lower


its overall billings?


(4) Are there other telecommunication or computer


charges that are critical to the delivery of


program services?

Req. No. 1413 Page 13


k. Contractual Services:


(1) What services are contracted?


(2) Are any of these services that could be provided


using existing staff?


(3) Are there services currently performed by full-


time staff that could be provided more


efficiently through a contract?


(4) Are funds for contracts spent in a timely manner


or are there contracts that act as a “parking lot”


for funds between years and may take multiple


fiscal years to spend down?


(5) Are contractors working on specific time-limited


projects or ongoing routine work?


(6) As with real estate, the agency may be asked to


provide a list of all contracts associated with


the program, their cost, and any specifics


associated with the contract (options for


renewing, penalties for early termination, etc.)


l. Unique Object Classes:


(1) Why was a unique object class created?


(2) What account codes are charged for expenditures


related to the unique object class?


(3) How are the funds in the unique object class


used?

Req. No. 1413 Page 14


2. Summarize the Analysis: For each summary of zero-based


summary analysis, positive results and areas that need improvement


shall be highlighted. Questions, including but not limited to the


following should be addressed in discussions with the LOFT Analysts


and Agency personnel:


a. Do the program’s goals align with the Agency mission


statement, statutory authority, directives of the


Cabinet member overseeing your agency, Governor’s


strategic plan.


b. Is the program currently performing any activities


that are not statutorily authorized? What would be the


impact of halting those activities? Conversely, are


there activities the program is not performing that it


is statutorily required to do?


c. What have the staffing trends been for the program for


the last 6 years?


d. Does the performance measure data the agency currently


collects provide an accurate depiction of the


efficiency and outcomes of the program and its


activities?


e. How have changes in funding affected the cost to


provide services?





Req. No. 1413 Page 15


f. What are the revenue and expense trends for the


program over the last few years? Has it affected


program services?


g. Can a program or activity be implemented more


efficiently? Are there alternative ways or less costly


ways the program could be implemented to deliver the


same services?


h. Does this program or activity have to be provided by


state government? Could the non- profit or private


sector or another level of government provide the


service?


i. Is this program or any of its services duplicative or


similar to other programs or services the state or


another entity outside of state government already


offers?


j. Given the cost vs. outcomes, is it a program the state


should continue to fund?


k. Would any laws need to change to end an activity or


alter it to make it more efficient?


l. If a program is successful, what best practices could


they offer for other programs or agencies?


m. What trends and outcomes are you seeing in performance


measures?



Req. No. 1413 Page 16


F. LOFT shall develop necessary forms for Agencies to provide


requested information. A sample form would include requests for the


following information:


Agency Name__________


Program Name__________


KEY ACTIVITIES:


Provide a brief overview of the agency’s purpose_____________


Provide a brief overview of the program’s purpose____________


Provide a list of the program’s top three ultimate and long-term


goals:


Goal 1:___________________


Goal 2:___________________


Goal 3:___________________


Please, list the program’s key activities, and complete the table


below:


Key Activity 1:_________________________


Key Activity 2:_________________________


Key Activity 3:_________________________


Key Activity 4:_________________________


Key Activity 5:_________________________


SECTION 4. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-1413 AS 1/19/2025 5:43:53 AM



Req. No. 1413 Page 17